Illinois, session 104th, SB119.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prenatal Syphilis Act is amended by 5changing Sections 1 and 2 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 320/1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4801)7    Sec. 1. Every appropriate health care professional 8physician, or other person, attending in a professional 9capacity a pregnant woman in Illinois, shall test every 10pregnant person take or cause to be taken a sample of blood of 11such woman at the time of the first examination, and a second 12time sample of blood shall be taken or caused to be taken 13during the third trimester of pregnancy, between 27 through 32 14weeks of gestation. The These blood specimens collected shall 15be submitted to a laboratory approved by the Department of 16Public Health for a serological test for syphilis approved by 17the State Department of Public Health. In the event that a any 18such blood test shall show a positive or doubtful result an 19additional test or tests shall be made. The Such serological 20test or tests shall, upon request of any provider physician, 21be made free of charge by the State Department of Public Health 22or the Health Departments of cities, villages, and 23incorporated towns maintaining laboratories for the testing of   SB0119 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06117 RLC 16150 b1blood specimens of any woman who resides in that city, 2village, or incorporated town.3    The provisions of this Section shall not apply to any 4woman who objects to such serological tests on the grounds 5that such tests are contrary to her religious beliefs and 6practices.7(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 8    (410 ILCS 320/2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4802)9    Sec. 2. In reporting every birth or still birth, 10appropriate health care professionals physicians and others 11required to make such reports shall state on the birth 12certificate or still birth certificate, as the case may be, 13whether a blood test for syphilis has been made upon a specimen 14of blood taken from the woman who bore the child for which a 15birth or still birth certificate is filed, together with the 16date when the blood specimen was taken and the name of the 17laboratory making the test. In no event shall the birth or 18still birth certificate state the result of the test.19(Source: Laws 1939, p. 708.)